sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Vzdušný hokej > Diely stola na vzdušný hokej: Dúchadlá pre vzdušný hokej; Dosky stola na vzdušný hokej; Skrutky stola na vzdušný hokej; Káble stola na vzdušný hokej; Svorky stola na vzdušný hokej; Elektronika a senzory pre stolný vzdušný hokej; Nožičky stola na vzdušný hokej; Bočné lišty vzdušného hokeju
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Ilmakiekko > Ilmakiekkopöydän osat: Ilmakiekkopöytien puhaltimet; Ilmakiekkopöydän levyt; Ilmakiekkopöydän pultit; Ilmakiekkopöydän johdot; Ilmakiekkopöydän puristimet; Ilmakiekkopöytien elektroniikka ja anturit; Ilmakiekkopöydän jalat; Ilmakiekkopöytien reunat
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 에어 하키 > 에어 하키대 부품: 에어 하키 테이블 블로워; 에어 하키대 보드; 에어 하키대 볼트; 에어 하키대 케이블; 에어 하키대 클램프; 에어 하키 테이블 전자 장치 및 센서; 에어 하키대 다리; 에어 하키 테이블 레일
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Hóquei de ar > Peças de mesa de hóquei de ar: Ventiladores para mesas de air hockey; Tábuas de mesa de hóquei de ar; Parafusos de mesa de hóquei de ar; Cabos de mesa de hóquei de ar; Grampos de mesa de hóquei de ar; Eletrónica e sensores para mesas de air hockey; Pés de mesa de hóquei de ar; Calhas para mesas de air hockey
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Hockey de mesa > Piezas para mesas de hockey: Sopladores para mesas de air hockey; Tableros de mesa de hockey de aire; Pernos de mesa de hockey de aire; Cables de mesa de hockey de aire; Abrazaderas de mesa de hockey de aire; Sensores y componentes electrónicos para mesas de air hockey; Pies de mesa de hockey de aire; Rieles para mesas de air hockey
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Stolní hokej > Díly stolů na stolní hokej: Ventilátory na vzdušný hokej; Stolní desky pro vzdušný hokej; Šrouby ke stolu pro vzdušný hokej; Kabely ke stolu pro vzdušný hokej; Svorky pro stůl na vzdušný hokej; Elektronika a senzory stolů na vzdušný hokej; Nohy stolu pro vzdušný hokej; Mantinely na vzdušný hokej
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Air hockey > Onderdelen voor Air hockey-tafels: Airhockeytafelventilatoren; Borden voor Air hockey-tafels; Bouten voor Air hockey-tafels; Kabels voor Air hockey-tafels; Klemmen voor Air hockey-tafels; Airhockeytafelelektronica en -sensoren; Poten voor Air hockey-tafels; Airhockeytafelrails
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Air-Hockey > Air-Hockey-Tischzubehör: Air-Hockey-Gebläse; Ersatzbretter für Air-Hockey-Tische; Air-Hockey-Tischschrauben; Air-Hockey-Tischkabel; Air-Hockey-Tischklemmen; Elektronik & Sensoren für Air-Hockey-Tische; Air-Hockey-Tischfüße; Air-Hockey-Tischbanden
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Air Hockey > Pièces de table de hockey: Souffleries pour tables de air hockey; Plateaux de air hockey; Boulons de table de air hockey; Câbles de table de air hockey; Pinces de table de air hockey; Électronique et capteurs pour tables de air hockey; Pieds de table de air hockey; Bandes pour tables de air hockey
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Air hockey > Części stołu do gry w air hockey: Dmuchawy do stołów do cymbergaja; Płyty do stołu do air hockey'a; Śruby do stołu do air hockey'a; Kable do stołu do air hockey'a; Zaciski do stołu do air hockey'a; Elektronika i czujniki do stołów do cymbergaja; Nóżki do stołu do air hockey'a; Bandy do stołów do cymbergaja
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Stolni hokej > Dijelovi stola za stolni hokej: Puhači za stol za stolni hokej; Ploče za stol za stolni hokej; Vijci za stol za stolni hokej; Kablovi za stol za stolni hokej; Stezaljke za stol za stolni hokej; Elektronika i senzori za stol za stolni hokej; Noge za stol za stolni hokej; Pregrade za stol za stolni hokej
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Hava Hokeyi > Hava Hokeyi Masa Parçaları: Hava hokeyi masası fanları; Hava Hokeyi Masa Panoları; Hava Hokeyi Masa Cıvataları; Hava Hokeyi Masası Kabloları; Hava Hokeyi Masa Kelepçeleri; Hava hokeyi masası elektronikleri ve sensörleri; Hava Hokeyi Masa Ayakları; Hava hokeyi masası rayları
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Аэрохоккей > Детали для столов для аэрохоккея: Вентиляторы для столов аэрохоккея; Игровые поверхности для столов для аэрохоккея; Болты для столов для аэрохоккея; Кабели для столов для аэрохоккея; Зажимы для столов для аэрохоккея; Электроника и датчики для столов аэрохоккея; Ножки для столов для аэрохоккея; Борта для столов аэрохоккея
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Въздушен хокей > Части за маса за въздушен хокей: Духалки за маса за въздушен хокей; Дъски за маса за въздушен хокей; Болтове за маса за въздушен хокей; Кабели за маса за въздушен хокей; Скоби за маса за въздушен хокей; Електроника и сензори за маса за въздушен хокей; Крака за маса за въздушен хокей; Релси за маса за въздушен хокей
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Airhockey > Airhockeyborde – dele: Blæsere til airhockeyborde; Airhockeyborde – plader; Airhockeyborde – bolte; Airhockeyborde – kabler; Airhockeyborde – klemmer; Elektronik og sensorer til airhockeyborde; Airhockeyborde – fødder; Bander til airhockeyborde
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > エアホッケー用品 > エアホッケー台パーツ: エアホッケーテーブル用ブロワー; エアホッケー台ボード; エアホッケー台ボルト; エアホッケー台ケーブル; エアホッケー台クランプ; エアホッケーテーブル用電子機器・センサー; エアホッケー台の脚; エアホッケーテーブル用レール
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Oro ritulys > Oro ritulio stalų dalys: Oro ritulio stalų pūstuvai; Oro ritulio stalų lentos; Oro ritulio stalų varžtai; Oro ritulio stalų kabeliai; Oro ritulio stalų spaustukai; Oro ritulio stalo elektronika ir jutikliai; Oro ritulio stalų kojos; Oro ritulio stalų borteliai
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Zračni hokej > Deli za mizo za zračni hokej: Puhalniki za mize za zračni hokej; Plošče za mizo za zračni hokej; Vijaki za mizo za zračni hokej; Kabli za mizo za zračni hokej; Objemke za mizo za zračni hokej; Elektronika in senzorji za namizni zračni hokej; Noge za mizo za zračni hokej; Robovi mize za zračni hokej
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 空气曲棍球 > 气悬球桌配件: 气垫球桌鼓风机; 空气曲棍球桌板; 空气曲棍球球桌螺栓; 空气曲棍球球桌线缆; 空气曲棍球桌夹; 气垫球桌电子设备与传感器; 空气曲棍球桌脚; 气垫球桌边轨
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Air hockey > Delar till air hockey-bord: Fläktar för airhockeybord; Air hockey-bordsbrädor; Air hockey-bordsbultar; Air hockey-bordskablar; Air hockey-bordsklämmor; Elektronik och sensorer för airhockeybord; Air hockey-bordsfötter; Sarger för airhockeybord
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Χόκεϊ αέρος > Ανταλλακτικά τραπεζιού χόκεϊ αέρος: Ανεμιστήρες τραπεζιών air hockey; Επιφάνειες τραπεζιού χόκεϊ αέρος; Βίδες τραπεζιού χόκεϊ αέρος; Καλώδια τραπεζιού χόκεϊ αέρος; Σφιγκτήρες τραπεζιού χόκεϊ αέρος; Ηλεκτρονικά συστήματα και αισθητήρες τραπεζιών air hockey; Πόδια τραπεζιού χόκεϊ αέρος; Ράγες τραπεζιών air hockey
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Lufthockey > Deler til lufthockeybord: Vifter til airhockeybord; Brett til air hockey-bord; Bolter til air hockey-bord; Kabler til air hockey-bord; Klemmer til air hockey-bord; Elektronikk og sensorer for airhockeybord; Føtter til air hockey-bord; Vant til airhockeybord
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Léghoki > Léghokiasztal-alkatrészek: Léghoki asztal ventilátorok; Léghokiasztal-táblák; Léghokiasztal-csavarok; Léghokiasztal-kábelek; Léghokiasztal-bilincsek; Léghoki asztal elektronika és érzékelők; Léghokiasztal-lábak; Léghoki asztal peremek
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Air hockey > Parti tavolo air hockey: Ventole per tavoli da air hockey; Superfici di gioco per tavoli da air hockey; Bulloni per tavolo da air hockey; Cavi da tavolo per air hockey; Morsetti da tavolo per air hockey; Sensori ed elettronica per tavoli da air hockey; Piedini per tavolo da air hockey; Sponde per tavoli da air hockey
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Khúc côn cầu bàn > Bộ phận bàn hockey mini: Quạt thổi khí bàn khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Ván bàn khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Bu lông bàn khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Dây cáp bàn khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Kẹp bàn khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Cảm biến & linh kiện điện tử bàn khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Chân bàn khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Thành bàn khúc côn cầu trên bàn
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 空氣曲棍球 > 氣墊球桌零件: 氣墊球桌鼓風機; 氣墊球桌板; 氣墊球桌螺栓; 氣墊球桌纜線; 氣墊球桌夾; 氣墊球桌電子零件與感測器; 氣墊球桌腳; 氣墊球桌邊軌
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Hóquei aéreo > Peças de mesa de hóquei aéreo: Sopradores de mesa de air hockey; Tábuas para mesa de hóquei de mesa; Parafusos para mesa de hóquei de mesa; Cabos para mesa de hóquei de mesa; Braçadeiras para mesa de hóquei de mesa; Eletrônicos e sensores de mesa de air hockey; Pés para mesa de hóquei de mesa; Bordas de mesa de air hockey
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > แอร์ฮอกกี้ > ชิ้นส่วนโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้: พัดลมเป่าลมโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้; แผ่นโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้; น็อตโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้; สายเคเบิลโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้; แคลมป์หนีบโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้; อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์และเซ็นเซอร์โต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้; ขาโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้; ขอบโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Air hockey > Piese masă de air hockey: Suflante pentru mese de air hockey; Plăci pentru masă de air hockey; Șuruburi pentru masă de air hockey; Cabluri pentru masă de air hockey; Cleme pentru masă de air hockey; Electronică și senzori pentru mese de air hockey; Piciorușe pentru masă de air hockey; Șine pentru mese de air hockey
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Air Hockey > Air Hockey Table Parts: Air Hockey Table Blowers; Air Hockey Table Boards; Air Hockey Table Bolts; Air Hockey Table Cables; Air Hockey Table Clamps; Air Hockey Table Electronics & Sensors; Air Hockey Table Feet; Air Hockey Table Rails